Utah statutes.
69-1-4.   Transmitting certified instruments -- Burden of proof.

Except as hereinbefore otherwise provided, any instrument in writing, duly certified under his hand and official seal by a notary public, commissioner of deeds or clerk of a court of record to be genuine to the personal knowledge of such officer, may, together with such certificate, be sent by telegraph or telephone. The telegraphic or telephonic copy thereof shall, prima facie only, have the same force, effect and validity in all respects as the original, and the burden of proof shall be on the party denying the genuineness or due execution of the original.



No Change Since 1953

